California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
(c) When engaged in the producing of olives for processing into olive oil or handling of olive oil, fail or
 refuse to furnish to the commission or its duly authorized agents, upon request, information concerning the name and address of the persons from whom he or she has received olive oil and the quantity so received.

(d) Secrete, destroy, or alter records required to be kept by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 344, Sec. 1.   (SB 250)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

79882.

For purposes of according individuals aggrieved by its actions or determinations, the commission board of directors shall establish procedures for an informal hearing before the commission or before a committee of the commission established for this purpose. Appeals from the decision of the commission board of directors may be made to the secretary. The determination of the secretary shall be subject to judicial review upon petition filed with the appropriate superior court.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 344, Sec. 1.   (SB 250)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

79883.

(a) The commission may commence civil actions and utilize all remedies provided in law or equity for the collection of assessments and civil penalties, and for obtaining injunctive relief or specific performance, relating to this chapter and the rules and regulations adopted under this chapter. A court shall issue to the commission any requested writ of attachment or injunctive relief upon a prima facie showing by verified complaint that a named defendant has violated this chapter or any other rule or regulation of the commission, including, but not limited to, the nonpayment of assessments. No bond shall be required to be posted by the commission as a condition for the issuance of any writ of attachment or injunctive
 relief.

(b) A writ of attachment shall be issued pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 485.010) of Title 6.5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that the showing specified in Section 485.010 is not required. Injunctive relief shall be issued pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that the showing of irreparable harm or of inadequate remedy at law specified by Section 526 or 527 is not required.

(c) Upon entry of any final judgment on behalf of the commission against any defendant, the court shall enjoin the defendant from conducting any type of business regarding the production of olives or handling of olive oil until there is full compliance with, and satisfaction of, the
 judgment.

(d) Upon a favorable judgment for the commission, the court may order that the commission be reimbursed for reasonable attorney’s fees and other related costs actually incurred. Venue for these actions is at the domicile or place of business of the defendant or in the county of the principal office of the commission. The commission may be sued only in the county of its principal office.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 344, Sec. 1.   (SB 250)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

79884.

Any action by the commission for any penalty or other remedy that is prescribed under this chapter shall be commenced within two years from the date of discovery of the alleged violation. Any action against the commission by any person shall be commenced within two years from the date of the alleged violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 344, Sec. 1.   (SB 250)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

79885.

The commission shall not be required to allege or prove that an adequate remedy at law does not exist in any action brought under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 344, Sec. 1.   (SB 250)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

79886.

This chapter shall be liberally construed. If any section, clause, or part of this chapter is for any reason held unconstitutional or invalid as applied to any person or as applied under certain circumstances, that decision shall not affect the remaining portions of this chapter or the application of this chapter to any other persons or under any other circumstance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 344, Sec. 1.   (SB 250)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

79887.

The termination of this chapter shall not affect or waive any right, duty, obligation, or liability that has arisen or that may thereafter arise in connection with this chapter, release or extinguish any violation of this chapter, or affect or impair any right or remedies of the commission with respect to any violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 344, Sec. 1.   (SB 250)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Continuation or Suspension and Termination [79891. - 79895.]

79891.

(a) Five years after implementation of this chapter, the secretary shall hold a public hearing, after providing proper notice to persons subject to this chapter and any other persons or entities who have requested, in writing, notice of the hearing, to determine whether the operation of this chapter should be continued. If the secretary finds after the hearing that a substantial question exists among the producers assessed under this chapter regarding whether the operation of this chapter should be continued, the secretary shall submit the chapter to a reapproval referendum to be conducted among producers to determine whether the operation of this chapter shall be reapproved and continued in effect.

(b) If the secretary finds after conducting a hearing that no substantial question exists or, if a reapproval referendum is required, that a majority of the eligible producers voting in the referendum voted in favor of continuing the operation of this chapter, the secretary shall certify the vote and this chapter shall remain operative. If the secretary finds that a favorable vote has not been given, he or she shall certify the vote and declare the operation of this chapter suspended upon the expiration of the current marketing season. Thereupon, the operations of the commission shall be concluded and funds distributed in the manner provided in Section 79894. A bond or security shall not be required for the referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 344, Sec. 1.   (SB 250)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

79892.

Following a hearing, and favorable referendum if required, the process specified in Section 79891 shall be conducted by the secretary every five years thereafter between July 1 and June 30 of the following year, unless a referendum is conducted as the result of a petition pursuant to Section 79893. In that case, the hearing, and referendum if required, shall be conducted every five years following the industry petitioned referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 344, Sec. 1.   (SB 250)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

79893.

(a) Upon a finding by a two-thirds vote of the commission board of directors that the operation of this chapter has not tended to effectuate its declared purposes, the commission may recommend to the secretary that the commission be suspended. Any suspension shall not become effective until expiration of the current marketing season.

(b) (1) The secretary shall, upon receipt of a recommendation, or may, after a public hearing to review a petition described in paragraph (2) requesting the suspension, cause a referendum to be conducted among the listed producers to determine if the operations of the commission shall be suspended. The secretary shall
 not hold a referendum as a result of a petition described in paragraph (2) unless the petitioner shows by the weight of evidence that the implementation of this chapter has not effectuated its declared purposes.

(2) A petition filed requesting suspension of the commission shall be signed by at least 15 percent of the producers, by number, who also produce at least 15 percent of the total volume of olives marketed in the preceding marketing season.

(c) The secretary shall establish a referendum period, which shall not be less than 10 days or more than 60 days in duration. The secretary may prescribe additional procedures necessary to conduct the referendum. At the close of the established referendum period, the secretary shall tabulate the ballots filed during the period.
 The secretary shall suspend the operation of this chapter, if the secretary finds at least 40 percent of the total number of producers from the list established by the secretary participate, and that either of the following occurs:

(1) Sixty-five percent of the producers that voted in the referendum voted in favor of suspension, and the producers so voting produced a majority of the total quantity of olives processed into olive oil in the preceding marketing season by all of the producers voting in the referendum.

(2) A majority of the producers that voted in the referendum voted in favor of suspension, and the producers so voting produced 65 percent or more of the total quantity of olives processed into olive oil in the preceding marketing season by all of the producers voting in the
 referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 344, Sec. 1.   (SB 250)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

79894.

After the effective date of suspension of this chapter, the operations of the commission shall be concluded and all moneys held by the commission, and moneys collected by assessment and not required to defray the expenses of concluding and terminating operations of the commission, shall be returned upon a pro rata basis to all persons from whom assessments were collected in the immediately preceding marketing season. However, if the commission board of directors finds that the amounts returnable are so small as to make impractical the computation and remitting of the pro rata refund to those persons, any moneys remaining after payment of all expenses of winding up and terminating operations shall be withdrawn from the approved depository and paid
 into an appropriate state or federal program or used to fund activities related to the subject matter of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 344, Sec. 1.   (SB 250)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

79895.

Upon suspension of the operation of this chapter, the commission shall mail a copy of the notice of suspension to producers affected by the suspension whose names and addresses are on file.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 344, Sec. 1.   (SB 250)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Quality Standards [79901. - 79902.]

79901.

The commission board of directors may recommend to the secretary the adoption and amendment of olive oil grades and labeling standards, in accordance with the California Marketing Act of 1937 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 58601) of Part 2 of Division 21), unless otherwise specified in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 344, Sec. 1.   (SB 250)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

79902.

The commission board of directors shall serve as the advisory body to the secretary on all matters pertaining to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 344, Sec. 1.   (SB 250)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 30. California Agave Commission [79911. - 79995.]



  ARTICLE 1. Declarations and General Provisions [79911. - 79917.]

79911.

The cultivation of agave for processing into agave products and the marketing of agave and agave products constitute an important industry of this state, which provides substantial and necessary revenues for the state and employment for its residents.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79912.

The cultivation of agave in California is consistent with and supportive of California’s environmentally sensitive policies relating to sustainable farming practices, including water conservation, through the cultivation of drought tolerant crops.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79913.

The establishment of the commission is necessary for the efficient management of activities authorized in this chapter. The commission is also necessary to enhance the competitiveness of the industry within the state, national, and international marketplace.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79914.

The purposes of this chapter are hereby declared to be in the public interest. This chapter is enacted in the exercise of the police power of this state for the purpose of protecting the health, peace, safety, and general welfare of the people of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79915.

The commission form of administration created by this chapter is uniquely situated to provide those engaged in the activities specified in this chapter the opportunity to avail themselves of the benefits of collective action in the broad fields of research, education, promotion, and marketing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79916.

No action taken by the commission, or by any individual in accordance with this chapter or with bylaws or procedures established pursuant to this chapter, shall be deemed a violation of the Cartwright Act (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 16700) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code), the Unfair Practices Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 17000) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code), or any statutory or common law against monopolies or combinations in restraint of trade.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79917.

It is the intent of the Legislature that members of the commission represent and further the interests of the agave industry and that this representation and furtherance serve the public interest. Accordingly, the Legislature finds that with respect to persons who are elected or appointed to the commission, the agave industry is tantamount to, and constitutes, the public generally within the meaning of Section 87103 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [79921. - 79933.]

79921.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79922.

(a) “Agave” means the species of plants in the genus Agave of the family Asparagaceae cultivated for their juice and fiber.

(b) Agave cultivated solely for ornamental purposes is not subject to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79923.

“Books and records” means books, records, contracts, documents, memoranda, papers, correspondence, or other written data pertaining to matters relating to the activities subject to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79924.

“Commission” means the California Agave Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79925.

“Cultivate” or “cultivated” means to plant, tend, harvest, or improve agave. Cultivated acreage does not include acreage removed from cultivation due to weather, disease, or other circumstances beyond the control of the grower.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79926.

“Ex officio members” means nonvoting members of the commission board of directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79927.

“Grower” means a person who commercially cultivates agave, or causes agave to be cultivated, not in a container and on two acres or more during the marketing season.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79928.

“Market” or “marketing” means to sell agave and agave products into commercial channels of trade.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79929.

“Marketing season” or “fiscal year” are synonymous terms and mean the period beginning April 1 of any year and extending through March 31 of the following year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79930.

“Process” or “processing” means to engage in the business of a processor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79931.

(a) “Processor” means a person licensed to commercially process agave and who processes agave in an amount of more than three tons in the state in the preceding marketing season.

(b) When the processor is a corporation or a limited liability company, all of the directors, officers, managers, and members of the corporation or limited liability company shall be treated as individuals when determining compliance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79932.

“Public member” means a person appointed to the commission board of directors pursuant to the procedures specified in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79933.

“Secretary” means the Secretary of Food and Agriculture.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. California Agave Commission [79936. - 79952.]

79936.

(a) There is in state government the California Agave Commission. Except as provided in this section, the commission board of directors shall be composed of six growers, two processors, and one public member. The public member shall be appointed to the commission by the secretary from nominees recommended by the commission.

(b) The commission board of directors may modify the number of members who serve on the commission board of directors by a two-thirds vote that is concurred in by the secretary, if proper notice is provided to all persons subject to this chapter before the action.

(c) The secretary and
 other appropriate persons, as determined by the commission, shall be ex officio members of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79937.

(a) The secretary may require the commission to correct or cease any existing activity or function that is determined by the secretary to not be in the public interest or to be in violation of this chapter.

(b) If the commission refuses or fails to cease those activities or functions or to make corrections as required by the secretary, the secretary may, upon written notice, suspend all or a portion of the activities or functions of the commission until the cessation or correction of activities or functions as required by the secretary have been accomplished by the commission.

(c) Actions of the commission
 in violation of the secretary’s written notice shall be without legal force or effect. The secretary, to the extent feasible, shall issue the written notice before the commission enters into a contractual relationship affecting the existing or proposed activities or functions that are the subject of the written notice.

(d) Upon service of the written notice, the secretary shall notify the commission in writing of the specific acts that the secretary determines are not in the public interest or are in violation of this chapter, and the secretary’s reasons for requiring a cessation or correction of specific existing or proposed activities or functions, and may make recommendations that will make those activities or functions acceptable to the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79938.

The commission or the secretary may bring an action for judicial relief from the secretary’s written notice, or from noncompliance by the commission with the written notice, in a court of competent jurisdiction, which may issue a temporary restraining order, permanent injunction, or other applicable relief.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79939.

The commission shall reimburse the secretary for all expenditures incurred by the secretary in carrying out their duties and responsibilities under this chapter. However, a court may, if it finds that the secretary acted arbitrarily or capriciously in restricting the activities or functions of the commission, relieve the commission of the responsibility for payment of the secretary’s legal costs with regard to that action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79940.

Except for the ex officio members of the commission board of directors, each member of the commission board of directors shall have an alternate member elected in the same manner as the member. An alternate member, in the absence of the member for whom they are an alternate, shall serve in place of the member. An alternate member may also serve in place of any other absent member of the same classification if the member’s alternate is also absent. However, an alternate member may not serve in place of more than one absent member at a meeting. An alternate member serving in place of a member shall have, and may exercise, all rights, privileges, and powers of the member when serving. In the event of death, removal, resignation, or the disqualification
 of a member, the alternate for the member, or another alternate of the same classification if the alternate member for the member is absent, shall act as the member until a qualified successor is elected.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79941.

Any vacancy on the commission board of directors, including, but not limited to, the failure of any person elected or appointed to the commission board of directors as a member or alternate member to continue in their position due to a change in status making them ineligible to serve, or due to death, removal, or resignation, shall be filled by the election of another person, or appointment in the case of a public member, for the unexpired portion of the term, with elected positions to be filled by a majority vote of the commission board of directors. However, the person elected or appointed shall fulfill all the qualifications set forth in this article as required for the office they are to occupy. The qualifications of any person to fill a
 vacancy shall be certified in writing to the secretary. The secretary shall notify the commission if the secretary determines that the person is not qualified.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79942.

A grower member and their alternate on the commission board of directors shall be an individual, partner, or employee of a grower who has a financial interest in cultivating agave, or causing agave to be cultivated. The grower member and their alternate shall comply with this section during the entire term of their office in order to remain on the commission board of directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79943.

A processor member and their alternate on the commission board of directors shall be an individual, partner, or employee of a processor who has a financial interest in processing agave, or causing agave to be processed. The processor member and their alternate shall comply with this section during the entire term of their office in order to remain on the commission board of directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79944.

The public member and their alternate on the commission board of directors shall have all the powers, rights, and privileges of any other member on the commission board of directors. The public member shall not have any financial interest in the cultivating or processing of agave or the marketing of agave products but may be an individual who provides services to individuals who do have a financial interest. The public member and their alternate shall comply with this section during the entire term of their office.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79945.

(a) The term of office of each member of the commission board of directors and their alternate, except an ex officio member, shall be three years from the date of their election or appointment and until their successor is elected.

(b) An alternate shall serve the same term as the member for whom they serve as alternate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79946.

The commission may sue and be sued and enter into contracts. Copies of its proceedings, records, and acts, when authenticated, shall be admissible in evidence in all courts of the state, and shall be prima facie evidence of the truth of all statements within the proceedings, records, and acts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79947.

A quorum of the commission board of directors is a majority of the members authorized to vote. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the vote of a majority of these members present at a meeting at which there is a quorum shall constitute an act of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79948.

The secretary or their representatives shall be notified and may attend each meeting of the commission board of directors and any meetings of a committee established by the commission, except the secretary is not authorized to attend an executive session of the commission board of directors called for the purpose of discussing potential or actual litigation against the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79949.

A member of the commission board of directors or of any committee established by the commission, shall not receive a salary. Except for ex officio government members, members and alternates may receive reasonable and necessary traveling expenses and meal allowances, as established by the commission board of directors, for each day spent in actual attendance at, or in traveling to and from, meetings of the commission or committees of the commission, or on special assignment for the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79950.

If the secretary is required to concur in a decision of the commission, the secretary shall indicate their response within 15 working days from notification of the decision. The response may be a request that additional information be provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79951.

All moneys received by a person from assessments levied under the authority of this chapter or otherwise received by the commission shall be deposited into banks designated by the commission board of directors and shall be disbursed by order of the commission board of directors through an agent or agents designated for that purpose. Any authorized agent or agents shall be bonded by a fidelity bond, executed by a surety company authorized to transact business in the state, in favor of the commission, in the amount of not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79952.

The state shall not be liable for the acts of the commission or its contracts. Payments of all claims arising by reason of the administration of this chapter or acts of the commission shall be limited to the funds collected by the commission. Members and alternate members of the commission board of directors, employees, and agents of the commission shall not be personally liable for the contracts of the commission, and members and alternate members of the commission board of directors and employees of the commission shall not be responsible individually in any way to a grower, processor, or any other person for error in judgment, mistakes, or other acts, either of commission or omission, as principal, agent, or employee, except for their own individual
 acts of dishonesty or crime. Members and alternate members of the commission board of directors shall not be held responsible individually for any act or omission of any other member or alternate member. The liability of the members and alternate members of the commission board of directors shall be several and not joint, and a member or alternate member shall not be liable for the default of any other member or alternate member.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Powers and Duties [79956. - 79956.]

79956.

The powers and duties of the commission board of directors shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(a) Adopt and from time to time alter, rescind, modify, and amend bylaws and procedures for carrying out this chapter, including procedures for related appeals. These actions shall not be subject to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) Administer and enforce this chapter and perform all acts and exercise all powers incidental to, or in connection with, or determined reasonably necessary for, proper or advisable effectuation of the purposes of
 this chapter.

(c) Appoint officers from the members of the commission board of directors, including a chair, one or more vice chairs, and any other officers as it determines necessary. The officers shall have the powers and duties delegated to them by the commission board of directors.

(d) Employ a person to serve at the pleasure of the commission as president and chief executive officer, and other personnel, including legal counsel, necessary to carry out this chapter. Alternatively, the commission may retain a management firm or staff from any board, commission, or committee of the state to perform the functions prescribed by this subdivision under control of the commission board of directors. If a person subject to this subdivision engages in conduct that the secretary
 determines to be in violation of this chapter, or is not in the public interest, the secretary shall notify the commission of the conduct and request that corrective, and if appropriate, disciplinary action, be taken by the commission board of directors. If the commission board of directors fails or refuses to correct the situation or to take disciplinary action satisfactory to the secretary, the secretary may suspend or discharge the person subject to this subdivision.

(e) Fix the compensation for all employees.

(f) Appoint committees composed of members, alternates, and nonmembers of the commission board of directors to advise in carrying out this chapter.

(g) Establish offices and incur expenses, invest funds, enter
 into contracts and agreements, and create liabilities and borrow funds in advance of receipt of assessments as determined necessary for the proper administration and enforcement of this chapter and the performance of its duties.

(h) Keep accurate books, records, and accounts of all of its dealings, which shall be subject to an annual audit by an auditing firm selected by the commission board of directors with the concurrence of the secretary. The audit shall be made a part of an annual report to all growers and processors subject to this chapter, and, notwithstanding Sections 9795 and 10231.5 of the Government Code, copies of the audit shall be submitted to the Legislature and the department. In addition, the secretary may, as they determine necessary, conduct, or cause to be conducted, a fiscal and compliance audit of the commission.

(i) Present facts to, and negotiate with, state, federal, and foreign agencies on matters that affect the purposes of this chapter.

(j) Make, in the name of the commission, contracts to render service in formulating and conducting plans and programs, and any other contracts or agreements determined to be necessary for the purposes specified in this chapter.

(k) Conduct, and contract with others to conduct, research, including the study, analysis, dissemination, and accumulation of information obtained from research or elsewhere for purposes described in this chapter that is primarily for the benefit of growers and processors. In connection with the research, accept contributions of, or to match, private, state, or federal
 funds that may be available for these purposes, and to employ or make contributions of funds to other persons or state or federal agencies conducting the research.

(l) Collect information and publish and distribute to growers and processors, a bulletin or other communication for dissemination of information relating to this chapter.

(m) Establish an assessment rate to defray operating costs.

(n) Establish an annual budget according to accepted accounting practices. The budget shall be concurred in by the secretary before the disbursement of funds, except for disbursements made pursuant to subdivision (e).

(o) Submit to the secretary for their
 concurrence, an annual statement of contemplated activities authorized under this chapter.

(p) Investigate and prosecute civil violations of this chapter and file complaints with appropriate law enforcement agencies or officers for suspected criminal violations of this chapter.

(q) Prescribe the form and manner by which proponents and opponents of the commission may contact growers if all expenses associated with the contacts are paid in advance.

(r) Engage in communications with the public regarding activities authorized in this section.

(s) Conduct activities related to education, marketing, and promotion of agave and agave
 products.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Implementation and Voting Procedures [79961. - 79968.]

79961.

(a) No later than 90 days from the request of proponents of the commission, the secretary shall establish a list of growers and processors eligible to vote on the implementation of this chapter. The proponents shall provide the secretary with a list of growers and processors of agave to assist in identifying eligible voters. In establishing the list, the secretary shall require that (1) growers submit their names and mailing addresses and planted acreage, (2) processors submit their names and mailing addresses and the names and addresses of growers from whom agave is received, and the paid weight to the growers during the preceding marketing season. The request for the information shall be in writing. The information shall be
 filed with the secretary within 10 days following receipt of the written request for information.

(b) A grower or processor whose name does not appear on the secretary’s list may have their name placed on the list by filing with the secretary a signed statement identifying themselves as a grower or processor. Failure to be on the list does not exempt the grower or processor from paying assessments under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79962.

The commission shall not be established, and this chapter shall not be implemented, except as necessary to conduct an implementation referendum vote, until the secretary finds all of the following in a referendum vote conducted by the secretary:

(a) At least 40 percent of the total number of growers from the list established by the secretary pursuant to this article participate, and that either of the following occurs:

(1) Sixty-five percent of the growers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of establishing the commission, and those growers cultivated a majority of the total quantity of agave cultivated in the preceding
 marketing season by all of the growers voting in the referendum.

(2) A majority of the growers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of establishing the commission, and those growers cultivated 65 percent or more of the total quantity of agave cultivated in the preceding marketing season by all of the growers voting in the referendum.

(b) At least 40 percent of the total number of processors from the list established by the secretary pursuant to this article participate, and that either of the following occurs:

(1) Sixty-five percent of the processors who voted in the referendum voted in favor of establishing the commission, and those processors processed a majority of the total quantity of agave processed in
 the preceding marketing season by all of the processors voting in the referendum.

(2) A majority of the processors who voted in the referendum voted in favor of establishing the commission, and those processors processed 65 percent or more of the total quantity of agave processed in the preceding marketing season by all of the processors voting in the referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79963.
